en_US.aff
FLAG num
SFX 70 Y 47	
SFX 70 0 ිති  .	
SFX 70 0 ිත්වා  .	
SFX 70 0 නවා  .	
SFX 70 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 70 0 නීය  .	
SFX 70 0 නෙමි  .	
SFX 70 0 නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 70 0 නෙමු  .	
SFX 70 0 නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 70 0 නෙහි  .	
SFX 70 0 නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 70 0 නේය  .	
SFX 70 0 නෝය  .	
SFX 70 0 පන්  .	
SFX 70 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 70 0 ිමි  .	
SFX 70 0 ිමිවා  .	
SFX 70 0 ිමු  .	
SFX 70 0 ිමුවා  .	
SFX 70 0 ියි  .	
SFX 70 0 දව  .	
SFX 70 0 දවති  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නීය  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නෙහු  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නේය  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නෝය  .	
SFX 70 0 දවමි  .	
SFX 70 0 දවමු  .	
SFX 70 0 දවයි  .	
SFX 70 0 දවහි  .	
SFX 70 0 දවහු  .	
SFX 70 0 ිවු  .	
SFX 70 0 දහි  .	
SFX 70 0 දහිවා  .	
SFX 70 0 දහු  .	
SFX 70 0 දහුවා  .	
SFX 70 0 දමින්  .	
SFX 70 0 ගෙන  .	
SFX 70 0 නට  .	
SFX 70 0 දවන්නට  .	
SFX 70 0 නලද  .	
SFX 70 0 දවමින්  .	
SFX 70 0 ිද්දී  .	
SFX 70 0 නලදී  .	

SFX 80 Y 1	
SFX 80 0 ම .	
