en_US.dic
ඉන්/70
න්‍යෂ්ටික/80
වැඩි/80
අබිලි/80
ග්‍රාමීය/80
සාමාන්‍ය/80
දැවැන්ත/80
ප්‍රබල/80
ප්‍රචණ්ඩකාරී/80
ඉදිරි/80
පක්ෂපාතී/80
සමීප/80
මූලික/80
භූගත/80
ප්‍රධාන/80
අසල්වැසි/80
අවසන්/80
වැරදි/80
ප්‍රථමයෙන්/80
ප්‍රමාණවත්/80
වයස්ගත/80
ආරක්ෂිත/80
වියළි/80
යටත්/80
සුළුතර/80
යට/80
ගෝත්‍රික/80
නිෂ්ක්‍රීය/80
දරුණු/80
අභීත/80
අභ්‍යන්තර/80
කිලිටි/80
ප්‍රගතිශීලී/80
ආසන්න/80
පිරිමි/80
ප්‍රතිචාරාත්මක/80
ඈත/80
නේවාසික/80
ජනප්‍රිය/80
අසතුටුදායක/80
අතිරේක/80
අපහසු/80
ක්‍රිස්තියානි/80
කුඩා/80
සුදු/80
විශාල/80
ස්වයංක්‍රීය/80
අපැහැදිලි/80
අධ්‍යාත්මික/80
යාබද/80
සවිස්තරාත්මක/80
සාමකාමී/80
අනවසර/80
පැරණි/80
රසායනික/80
ව්‍යාජ/80
පහල/80
සමාජයීය/80
විශිෂ්ට/80
නිරවද්‍ය/80
සිත්කළු/80
දුර/80
සංවේදී/80
වැඩිහිටි/80
විශ්‍රාමික/80
ප්‍රීති/80
මුදූ/80
ඵලදායී/80
සටන්කාමී/80
නොපැහැදිලි/80
අස්ථිර/80
ස්ථාවර/80
අස්ථාවර/80
සුපුරුදු/80
මිටි/80
අධික/80
වමටබර/80
වැඩියෙන්/80
සමාජ/80
මධ්‍යස්ථ/80
ධනවත්/80
ආක්‍රමණකාරී/80
අපේක්ෂිත/80
ආරම්භක/80
පෞද්ගලික/80
අසාධ්‍ය/80
බහුල/80
දීර්ඝ/80
උග්‍ර/80
එළිමහන්/80
අනුබද්ධ/80
සුභවාදී/80
අලුත්/80
සාමකාමි/80
වාමාංශික/80
දේශීය/80
කැරලිකාර/80
විරුද්ධ/80
පීඩිත/80
බරපතළ/80
ඒකීය/80
සංස්කෘතික/80
සමස්ථ/80
තදාසන්න/80
යහපත්/80
සත්කාරක/80
නම්‍යශීලී/80
සුප්‍රසිද්ධ/80
මරණීය/80
ඇතුළත්/80
දූෂිත/80
පූජනීය/80
පරණ/80
අනාථ/80
දිගු/80
ශ්‍රේෂ්ඨ/80
ධනාත්මක/80
ලජ්ජා/80
ශෝක/80
නොගැඹුරු/80
මාරාන්තික/80
ප්‍රසිද්ධ/80
ශක්තිමත්/80
රහසිගත/80
ප්‍රවීණ/80
ප්‍රාථමික/80
ශෝකී/80
වාණිජ/80
අහිමි/80
පහත/80
නාමික/80
උඩ/80
සුප්‍රකට/80
පැරැණි/80
සම්පූර්ණ/80
දේශපාලනික/80
ජනාකීර්ණ/80
අවම/80
ඕනෑ/80
කලාත්මක/80
බුද්ධිමත්/80
සමකාලීන/80
තිරසාර/80
ජාතිවාදී/80
තීරණාත්මක/80
කෙටි/80
ලොකු/80
අමාරු/80
කාර්යශීලී/80
අනතුරුදායක/80
සමීපත/80
ප්‍රුමුඛ/80
සමබර/80
පුදුම/80
දක්ෂ/80
හවුල්කාර/80
උභතෝකෝටික/80
දුගී/80
උණුසුම්/80
අවසාන/80
පරාජිත/80
ජනාකර්ෂණීය/80
නොවැදගත්/80
සාම්ප්‍රදායික/80
පළල්/80
උන්නතිකාමී/80
සීතල/80
නිහඬ/80
ආශ්වාදජනක/80
වැඩදායක/80
නූතන/80
ආක්‍රමණශීලී/80
අවලාදාත්මක/80
දර්ශනීය/80
ප්‍රිය/80
කවදාහරි/80
සමාන/80
අසරණ/80
මුල/80
හෘදයාංග/80
අවංක/80
වෙහෙසකාරී/80
නොසැලකිලිමත්/80
සදාචාරාත්මක/80
මුග්ධ/80
ක්ෂණික/80
බියකරු/80
කලබලකාරි/80
ක්‍රියාකාරි/80
අර්බූදකාරී/80
අහඹු/80
කාර්යාලයීය/80
සදාකාලික/80
මර්ධනකාරී/80
ජාතියේ/80
උතුම්/80
අගනා/80
ධර්මිෂ්ට/80
කනගාටුදායක/80
වැඩදායි/80
කටුක/80
පින්බර/80
චාම්/80
හය/80
දිළිදු/80
විනාශකාරී/80
කඩවසම්/80
සම්ප්‍රදායිකව/80
වේගී/80
ප්‍රගතිශීලි/80
අසාමාන්‍ය/80
තෙත/80
සුන්දර/80
ප්‍රචලිත/80
සුමුදු/80
ප්‍රශස්ත/80
අධිරාජ්‍යවාදී/80
හිතුවක්කාර/80
දේශාභිමානී/80
තකතීරු/80
සොඳුරු/80
සමෘධිමත්/80
ප්‍රචණ්ඩකාරි/80
සියලු/80
දීර්ඝකාලීන/80
‍ජාතික/80
පවුලේ/80
චංචල/80
ගෞරවනීය/80
අන්තවාදි/80
නොගැළපෙන/80
අග්‍රගණ්‍ය/80
ප්‍රගතිශීලි/80
ආරවුල්කාරි/80
දෙරටේ/80
වටිනා/80
හොඳට/80
පෞරාණික/80
විසල්/80
හොඳින්/80
උමතු/80
අන්තාවාදී/80
ජාතිකවාදි/80
අසල/80
නාඳුනන/80
ගෝලිය/80
තිරණාත්මක/80
නුතන/80
වියපත්/80
අනවශ්‍ය/80
අහිතකර/80
මහළු/80
පිස්සු/80
කෙළවර/80
අසීමිත/80
විදේශික/80
අනපේක්ෂිත/80
සමාරම්භක/80
බාධාකාරී/80
මාර/80
සරුසාර/80
සුඛෝපභෝගී/80
සතුටු/80
ජේෂ්ඨ/80
ගොවිපළේ/80
අලුතින්/80
තිරස්/80
ප්‍රෝඩාකාරී/80
දේශද්‍රෝහී/80
නීත්‍යනුකූල/80
යෝග්‍ය/80
සදානුස්මරණීය/80
පරාර්ථකාමී/80
‍පොඩි/80
විද්වත්/80
විශේෂයෙන්/80
තිරසර/80
දඟ/80
එක්ක/80
රත්තරං/80
හිටපු/80
පාරිසරික/80
ක්‍ෂණික/80
වයෝවෘද්ධ/80
අතිමහත්/80
වීරෝධී/80
ආබාධිත/80
හැඩකාර/80
ලස්සන/80
කොලු/80
අර්ථවත්/80
ලොව/80
මැදින්/80
උසස්/80
ආවේණික/80
පෝෂ්‍ය/80
නොවිධිමත්/80
විධිමත්/80
ළපටි/80
ඉපැරැණි/80
ස්වාභාවික/80
කෘත්‍රීම/80
පියකරු/80
නොමේරූ/80
මහලු/80
සියුම්/80
වැඩිපුර/80
වැදගත්/80
සිම්පල්/80
මනස්කාන්ත/80
මිල/80
බලෙන්/80
විශ්වාසවන්ත/80
නොදියුණු/80
විකාර/80
ලෙහෙසි/80
අනාගතවාදී/80
නොමිලේ/80
ආදර්ශ/80
නීත්‍යානුකූල/80
ඛේදනීය/80
ළඟදී/80
නොසන්සුන්/80
වඩා/80
දෙයාකාර/80
වැරැදී/80
උදෑසන/80
සාහසික/80
කුරිරු/80
ප්‍රකට/80
ශාසනික/80
රසවත්/80
සහනදායී/80
මන්දගාමී/80
උස/80
කෙතරම්/80
සහනශීලී/80
මියුරු/80
පවිත්‍ර/80
ළබැඳි/80
සාර්ථකව/80
උස්/80
නැණවත්/80
අස්ථීර/80
ආන්තික/80
සැකකාර/80
පරගැති/80
ආදරනීය/80
වෙනම/80
අදිසි/80
බොල්/80
කාව්‍ය/80
උල්/80
ඒකාකාර/80
විරුද්ධවාදී/80
සැදැහැවත්/80
ශීලාචාර/80
කෑදර/80
පිටරට/80
නිරහංකාර/80
කන්කලු/80
මධ්‍යගත/80
සක්‍රිය/80
වටිනා/80
අපවිත්‍ර/80
නිල්වන්/80
පස්සෙ/80
ප්‍රනීත/80
ලිබරල්වාදී/80
ගෞරවාන්විත/80
බඩජාරි/80
කටේ/80
නුදුරු/80
සැහැල්ලු/80
සම්මානනීය/80
සහනදායී/80
සහජ/80
ප්‍රණීත/80
සුවදායී/80
අර්බුදකාරී/80
වල්/80
දැකුම්කලු/80
නිසංසල/80
නිස්කලංක/80
හරවත්/80
අවදානම්/80
සදාචාර/80
ක‍්‍රමානුකූල/80
වර්ණවත්/80
කීර්තිමත්/80
සුලභ/80
නිර්දේශිත/80
ප්‍රත්‍යක්‍ෂ/80
විරෝධි/80
ආවේනික/80
වෙරළාසන්න/80
බංකොළොත්/80
ඊලඟ/80
පාරිභාෂික/80
ඇති/80
තාත්වික/80
ශීඝ්‍රව/80
තමන්ගේ/80
වාර්තාගත/80
සශ්‍රීක/80
දීප්තිමත්/80
ඇළ/80
ශීතල/80
ජරා/80
මෑතකාලීන/80
කවාකාර/80
මනෝවිද්‍යාත්මක/80
ඇතුලත්/80
ක්‍රමික/80
ව්‍යාධි/80
දුෂිත/80
පළමුව/80
ආශ්චර්යමත්/80
විද්‍යූත්/80
සංඛ්‍යාත්මක/80
බලසම්පන්නම/80
දිගුකාලීන/80
මිළ/80
දේශමාමක/80
අනර්ඝ/80
මැවුම්කාර/80
දුරස්ථ/80
සැඟවුණු/80
අසතුටු/80
සැලකියයුතු/80
අර්බුධකාරී/80
අවුල්/80
කේන්ද්‍රික/80
කාළීනව/80
වනචාරී/80
දිව්‍යය/80
අවශේෂ/80
අවශ්‍යය/80
කහ/80
සීල/80
නිර්මාණශීලී/80
ප්‍රාණවත්/80
උච්ච/80
තනිකර/80
ඛේදාත්මක/80
ඇඹුල්/80
උපායශීලී/80
වේග/80
උදාසීන/80
ආන්දෝලනාත්මක/80
දුබල/80
නාගරීක/80
සින්නක්කර/80
සමගාමී/80
සිල්වත්/80
පෙරලිකාර/80
මූළික/80
හානිදායක/80
නීච/80
අපරාධකාරී/80
අ‍ාවේණික/80
අද්භූත/80
සීත/80
අචේතනික/80
චක්‍රීය/80
අතෘප්තිකර/80
අනුයාත/80
පුරාතන/80
අපහසු/80
දූෂමාන/80
මිහිරි/80
ලාභදායක/80
පැතලි/80
ශෝකදායි/80
බො‍හෝ/80
පිටිසර/80
රස/80
අපරාජිත/80
විශාල/80
ප්‍රතිඵලදායී/80
සදාහරිත/80
හොදින්/80
හැඩැති/80
යටහත්/80
අසිරිමත්/80
නියමාකාර/80
ක්ෂණීකව/80
අස්ථානගත/80
පාදඩ/80
වාසිදායී/80
සභ්‍ය/80
අසත්‍ය/80
ලිස්සන/80
ආත්මාරක්ෂක/80
විනීත/80
දිනපතා/80
නිර්මාණශීලි/80
කෙටි/80
මෙවැනි/80
අබලන්/80
සම්පුර්ණයෙන්/80
